Utah statutes.
19-6-809.   Partial reimbursement.

(1) (a)  A recycler may submit an application under Section 19-6-813 to the local health department having jurisdiction over the applicant's business address for partial reimbursement for the cost of transporting and processing a waste tire or a material derived from a waste tire that:

(i)  meets the requirements of Subsections (3) and (4); and

(ii)  is used within the state for:

(A)  energy recovery or production;

(B)  the creation of an ultimate product;

(C)  the production of crumb rubber, if a contract exists for the sale of the crumb rubber for use, either within or outside the state, as a component in an ultimate product;

(D)  the production of a chipped tire, if:

(I)  the chipped tire is beneficially used, either within or outside the state; and

(II)  a contract exists for the sale of the chipped tire; or

(E)  a use defined in rule as recycling.

(b)  A recycler is not eligible to receive partial reimbursement for transportation or processing costs related to the creation of an ultimate product if:

(i)  the recycler used crumb rubber as a component of the ultimate product; and

(ii)  the recycler, or another recycler, previously received under this section partial reimbursement for transportation or processing costs related to the production of the crumb rubber.

(c)  A recycler who qualifies under this section for partial reimbursement may waive the reimbursement and request in writing that the reimbursement be paid to a person who:

(i)  delivers a waste tire or material derived from a waste tire to the recycler; or

(ii)  processes the waste tire before the recycler receives the waste tire or a material derived from the waste tire for recycling.

(d)  A recycler is not eligible to receive partial reimbursement for transportation or processing costs for baling:

(i)  whole waste tires; or

(ii)  materials derived from waste tires that are larger than shredded waste tires.

(2)  Subject to the limitations in Section 19-6-816, a recycler is entitled to:

(a)  $65 as partial reimbursement for each ton of waste tires or material derived from waste tires converted to crumb rubber, if a contract exists for the sale of the crumb rubber for use as a component in an ultimate product;

(b)  $50 as partial reimbursement for each ton of waste tires or material derived from waste tires recycled, other than as crumb rubber; and

(c)  $20 as partial reimbursement for each ton of chipped tires used for a beneficial use.

(3) (a)  A recycler is eligible for a partial reimbursement if the recycler establishes, in cooperation with a tire retailer or transporter, or both, a reasonable schedule to remove waste tires in sufficient quantities to allow for economic transportation of waste tires located in a municipality, as defined in Section 10-1-104, within the state.

(b)  A recycler who is eligible for partial reimbursement under Subsection (3)(a) may also receive partial reimbursement for recycling a tire received from a location within the state other than those associated with a retail tire business, including a waste tire from a waste tire pile or an abandoned waste tire pile, as provided by Section 19-6-810.

(4)  A recycler who applies for partial reimbursement under Subsection (1) shall demonstrate to the local health department identified in Subsection (1)(a) that:

(a)  the waste tire or material derived from a waste tire that qualifies for the reimbursement was:

(i) (A)  removed and transported by a registered waste tire transporter, a recycler, or a tire retailer; or

(B) generated by a private person who:

(I)  is not a waste tire transporter as defined in Section 19-6-803; and

(II)  brings the waste tire to the recycler; and

(ii)  generated in the state; and

(b)  if the tire is from a waste tire pile or abandoned waste tire pile, the recycler complied with the requirements of Section 19-6-810.

